Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1734
Revenue bonds; plans and specifications; prepare.

Before the issuance of any revenue bonds the city of the metropolitan class shall have an independent and qualified firm of engineers prepare plans and specifications for such improvements. In the preparation of the plans and specifications, the independent engineer shall collaborate and counsel with any city engineering or traffic department so as to coordinate the program with the program for the control of traffic within such city.

Laws 1971, LB 238, § 4.